Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 8 Ethics and Conflicts of Interest
Subchapter 8

— Disclosure by State and Local Officials — Conflict of Interest

Effective Dates. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1: Jan. 1, 1989.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: became law without governor's signature. Approved Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

21-8-801. Prohibited acts generally.

No public servant shall:

Receive a gift or compensation as defined in § 21-8-401 et seq., other than income and benefits from the governmental body to which he or she is duly entitled, for the performance of the duties and responsibilities of his or her office or position; or

Purposely use or disclose to any other person or entity confidential government information acquired by him or her in the course of and by reason of the public servant's official duties, to secure anything of material value or benefit for himself or herself or his or her family.

No person shall confer a gift or compensation as defined in § 21-8-401 et seq. to any public servant, the receipt of which is prohibited by subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

The first violation of this subsection by any person other than a registered lobbyist shall result in a written warning.

Upon a second violation and subsequent violations by persons other than registered lobbyists and upon a first violation by registered lobbyists, the penalties provided for in § 7-6-218 shall apply.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment redesignated the former introductory language as present (a); added “or” to the end of (a)(1); and added (b).

Ark. L. Notes.

Leflar, The Reform of Ethics Rules In Arkansas Government, 2000 Ark. L. Notes 65.

No legislator shall appear for compensation on behalf of another person, firm, corporation, or entity before any entity of:

The legislator's municipal government, if the legislator is a member of a city council or board of directors of a municipality; or

The legislator's school district board of directors, if the legislator is a member of a school district board of directors.

Preclude a legislator from acting on behalf of a constituent to determine the status of a matter without accepting compensation.

An appearance which is a matter of public record as provided in subdivision (b)(3) of this section may be made by:

Filing a written statement within twenty-four (24) hours with the agency head of the entity of state government, entity of county government, entity of municipal government, or school district before which an appearance is sought.

In the event that a written statement cannot be provided to the agency head prior to the meeting, telephonic notice must be given the agency head or his or her office; or

Filing a quarterly statement with the agency head of the entity of state government before which an appearance is sought.

A statement filed under subsection (c) of this section shall identify the client on behalf of whom the appearance is made and contain a general statement of the action sought from the governmental body.

The statements shall be retained by the agency head and shall be a matter of public record.

If the agency head determines that the release of the client's name would be an unwarranted invasion of individual privacy or would give advantage to competitors for bidding, the agency head may withhold the name until appropriate.

No member of the General Assembly shall receive any income or compensation as defined in § 21-8-401 et seq., other than income and benefits from the governmental body to which he or she is duly entitled, for lobbying other members of the General Assembly by communicating directly or soliciting others to communicate with any other member with the purpose of influencing legislative action by the General Assembly.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (a)(4); in (b)(2), inserted “entity of” twice and added “or school district board of directors”; and, in (c)(1)(A), inserted “entity of” twice and inserted “or school district”.

Prepare a written statement describing the matter requiring action and stating the potential conflict; and

Deliver a copy of the statement to the appropriate official to be filed with the statement of financial interest.

The copy of the statement may be delivered in person by the public official, by mail, or by a person authorized by the public official to deliver the copy.

The obligation to report a potential conflict of interest under this section arises as soon as the legislator is aware of the conflict.

If the statement of financial interest filed by the legislator makes the conflict readily apparent, then no report need be filed.

(1)The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Commissioner of State Lands, and Attorney General, in their official capacity, may accept gifts, grants, and donations of money or property on behalf of the state for any lawful public purpose.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives, in his or her official capacity, may accept gifts, grants, and donations of money or property on behalf of the House of Representatives for any lawful public purpose.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, in his or her official capacity, may accept gifts, grants, and donations of money or property on behalf of the Supreme Court for any lawful public purpose.

Not be of such a personal nature that their use is limited to a specific person or persons;

Be available to be enjoyed by the public at large; and

Become property of the governmental entity to which they were donated.

The designated officials may accept donations of money for the purpose of hosting the:

Official swearing-in and inaugural events of the constitutional officers, Senate, House of Representatives, and Supreme Court justices;

Official recognition event for the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

Official recognition event for the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The public official accepting the gift, grant, or donation of money on behalf of the appropriate entity shall disclose to the Arkansas Ethics Commission on a quarterly basis:

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 4; 2001, No. 1839, § 32.

21-8-802. Prohibited appearances — Exceptions.

State government, if the legislator is a member of the General Assembly;

The legislator's county government, if the legislator is a member of a quorum court;

This section shall not:

Apply to any judicial proceeding or to any hearing or proceeding which is adversarial in nature or character;

Apply to any hearing or proceeding on which a record is made by the entity of state government, entity of county government, entity of municipal government, or school district board of directors;

Apply to an appearance which is a matter of public record;

Apply to ministerial actions; or

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 4; 1995, No. 1111, § 1; 2017, No. 449, § 4.

21-8-803. Reporting of potential conflicts.

A legislator who is required to take an action in the discharge of his or her official duties that may affect his or her financial interest or cause financial benefit or detriment to him or her, or a business in which he or she is an officer, director, stockholder owning more than ten percent (10%) of the stock of the company, owner, trustee, partner, or employee, which is distinguishable from the effects of the action on the public generally or a broad segment of the public, shall:

History.

Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1989, No. 719, § 4.

21-8-804. Gifts to governmental entities.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate, in his or her official capacity, may accept gifts, grants, and donations of money or property on behalf of the Senate for any lawful public purpose.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the items received shall:

The gift, grant, or donation of money received;

The person donating the gift, grant, or donation of money; and

The estimated value of the gift, grant, or donation of money.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 239, § 2.

Subchapter 9

— Disclosure by Legislators — Sales to the State

21-8-901. Disclosure required.

In addition to the required filings under §21-8-701, a member or a member-elect of the General Assembly shall report any goods or services sold during the previous calendar year having a total annual value in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to an office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the State of Arkansas by the member, his or her spouse, or by any business in which such person or his or her spouse is an officer, director, or stockholder owning more than ten percent (10%) of the stock.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 808, § 1; 1999, No. 553, § 47.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “under §21-8-701, a member or a member-elect” for “under §21-8-401 et seq., a member,” inserted “during the previous calendar year,” and substituted “such person” for “the member.”

21-8-902. Place of filing — Form.

The disclosure required by § 21-8-901 shall be filed with the Secretary of State at the same time as the filing of the statement of financial interest required under § 21-8-701 et seq.

The disclosure shall be on a form requiring the signature of the member, under penalty of perjury, with respect to the truth and accuracy of the statements made on the form.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 808, § 1.

21-8-903. Penalty.

Any person who purposely violates the provisions of this subchapter shall be deemed guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 808, § 1.

Subchapter 10

— State Boards, Commissions, and Entities Receiving State Funds

A.C.R.C. Notes. This subchapter supplements the provisions in §21-8-304.

21-8-1001. Conflicts of interest.

No member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds shall participate in, vote on, influence, or attempt to influence an official decision if the member has a pecuniary interest in the matter under consideration by the board, commission, or entity.

A member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds may participate in, vote on, influence, or attempt to influence an official decision if the only pecuniary interest that may accrue to the member is incidental to his or her position or accrues to him or her as a member of a profession, occupation, or large class to no greater extent than the pecuniary interest could reasonably be foreseen to accrue to all other members of the profession, occupation, or large class.

No member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds shall participate in any discussion or vote on a rule or regulation that exclusively benefits the member.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “or board member of an entity receiving state funds” throughout and substituted “board, commission, or entity” for “board or entity.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 2; 2001, No. 1244, § 2.

21-8-1002. Use of position for privileges or exemptions.

No member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds shall use or attempt to use his or her official position to secure unwarranted privileges or exemptions for himself or herself or others.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 2; 2001, No. 1244, § 3.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment inserted “or board member of an entity receiving state funds.”

21-8-1003. Confidential information.

No member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds shall disclose confidential information acquired by him or her in the course of the member's official duties or use such information to further his or her personal interests.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 2; 2001, No. 1244, § 4.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment inserted “or board member of an entity receiving state funds” and made minor punctuation changes.

21-8-1004. Penalties — Investigation by Arkansas Ethics Commission.

In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision of law, any member of a state board or commission or board member of an entity receiving state funds who knowingly and intentionally violates any of the provisions of this subchapter may be removed from office by the appointing authority.

The Arkansas Ethics Commission may investigate complaints alleging a violation of this subchapter and may make recommendations to the appointing authority.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment inserted “or board member of an entity receiving state funds in (a).”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 2; 2001, No. 1244, § 5.

21-8-1005. Subchapter supplemental to other laws.

This subchapter shall be supplemental to all other laws concerning ethics or conflicts of interest.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1123, § 2.

21-8-310. Gifts from lobbyists.

21-8-502. Init. Meas. 1988, No. 1, § 1.